Maryland, session 2025, HB1275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–2A–09.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND BEFORE
THE BEGINNING OF THE 2025–2026 SCHOOL YEAR, THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL HIRE
A CONSTITUENT SERVICES LIAISON.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1275*

HOUSE BILL 1275
(2) THE PRESIDENT OF THE COUNTY BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH
COUNSEL FOR THE COUNTY BOARD, SHALL NEGOTIATE THE TERMS OF THE
EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT FOR THE CONSTITUENT SERVICES LIAISON.
(B) THE CONSTITUENT SERVICES LIAISON SHALL BE SUBJECT TO REMOVAL
BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE COUNTY BOARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF
THE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS
SECTION.
(C) THE CONSTITUENT SERVICES LIAISON SHALL:
(1) ACT AS THE LIAISON BETWEEN THE COUNTY BOARD AND
MEMBERS OF THE COMMUNITY;
(2) ASSIST COMMUNITY MEMBERS IN ACCESSING SERVICES OF ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS AND OTHER STATE AND COUNTY
EDUCATION–RELATED SERVICES; AND
(3) ENGAGE COMMUNITY PARTNERS AND LOCAL ORGANIZATIONS TO
ADVANCE THE STRATEGIC GOALS OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOLS.
(D) THE CONSTITUENT SERVICES LIAISON SHALL RECEIVE AN ANNUAL
SALARY OF $120,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.